Rhode Island, session 2026, HB7527.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Findings.
The general assembly finds and declares that student mentorship programs are most
effective when the mentor has an established relationship with the student, an understanding of the
student’s educational, social, and personal background, and professional training in student support
and development. The purpose of this chapter is to ensure that education mentorship services
provided in public schools are delivered by qualified professionals who possess the training,
certification, and access necessary to support the academic, social, and emotional success of
students.
SECTION 2. Title 16 of the General Laws entitled "EDUCATION" is hereby amended by
adding thereto the following chapter:
CHAPTER 117
EDUCATION MENTORSHIP PROGRAM ACT
16-117-1. Short title.
This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the "Education Mentorship Program Act".
16-117-2. Definitions.
For purposes of this chapter, the following terms shall have the following meanings:
(1) "Certified support educator" means an individual who holds a valid Rhode Island
educator certification or license in a student support discipline including, but not limited to:
(i) School guidance counselor;

(ii) School social worker;
(iii) School psychologist; or
(iv) Any other certified or licensed student support professional as determined by the
department of education.
(2) "Education mentor" means an adult assigned or designated by a school district or public
school to provide ongoing guidance, support, advocacy, and mentorship to a student or group of
students.
(3) "Public school" means any local education agency, school district, public charter
school, or state-operated school.
16-117-3. Qualifications of education mentors.
(a) Any education mentor providing mentorship services to students pursuant to this
chapter shall be a certified support educator.
(b) The education mentor shall, to the extent practicable:
(1) Have an existing professional relationship with the student; or
(2) Be assigned in a manner that allows sufficient time and access to develop a meaningful
and sustained relationship with the student.
(c) Education mentors shall have access to relevant student records, support plans, and
school-based resources, consistent with state and federal law, in order to effectively understand and
respond to the student's academic, social, emotional, and environmental needs.
16-117-4. Role and responsibilities of education mentors.
An education mentor under this chapter may:
(1) Provide individualized guidance and support aligned with the student's academic and
personal needs;
(2) Assist in identifying barriers to student success including, social, emotional, behavioral,
or environmental factors;
(3) Coordinate with educators, families, and community-based service providers, as
appropriate;
(4) Utilize evidence-based support strategies consistent with the mentor's professional
training and certification; and
(5) Advocate for appropriate interventions, accommodations, or services to support student
well-being and achievement.
16-117-5. Rules and regulations.
The department of education shall promulgate rules and regulations necessary to
implement the provisions of this chapter including, standards for mentor assignment, caseloads,
LC004826 - Page 2 of 4

and program oversight.
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC004826
========
LC004826 - Page 3 of 4